Hawaii statutes.
[§658D-7] Certain legal authorities for
international commercial disputes resolution. (a) A center shall not be
considered a department, agency, or public instrumentality of this State, and
shall not be subject to the laws of this State applying to departments,
agencies, and public instrumentalities of this State, except that a center
shall be subject to all of the laws of this State pertaining to nonprofit
corporations.

(b) A center shall permit the participants to
an arbitration to select any body of rules and procedures for the conduct,
administration, and facilitation of that proceeding, whether such rules and
procedures have been prepared by private arbitral organizations, created by the
participants themselves, or by the center.

(c) A center shall have the authority pursuant
to this chapter to establish from time to time such rules and procedures for
the conduct, administration, and facilitation of the resolution, whether by
arbitration, mediation, conciliation, or otherwise, of all disputes subject to
this chapter.

(d) In furtherance of the foregoing, a center
shall have the authority pursuant to this chapter to adopt rules providing,
without limitation and by way of illustration only, that any arbitral tribunal
or other panel established pursuant to such rules shall:

(1) Determine the relevance and materiality of the
evidence without the need to follow formal rules of evidence;

(2) Be able to utilize any lawful methods that it
deems appropriate to obtain evidence additional to that produced by the
parties;

(3) Issue subpoenas or other demands for the
attendance of witnesses or for the production of books, records, documents, and
other evidence;

(4) Be empowered to administer oaths, order
depositions to be taken or other discovery obtained, without regard to the
place where the witness or other evidence is located, and appoint one or more
experts to report to it;

(5) Fix such fees for the attendance of witnesses as
it deems appropriate;

(6) Make awards of interest, reasonable attorney's
fees and costs of the arbitration, mediation, or conciliation as agreed to in
writing by the parties, or in the absence of such agreement, as it deems
appropriate.

(e) In exercising the powers conferred upon it
by this chapter, such arbitral tribunal, or other panel may apply for
assistance from any court, tribunal or governmental authority in any
jurisdiction. Any application to a court hereunder shall be made and heard in
a summary way in the manner provided for the making and hearing of motions,
except as otherwise herein expressly provided. [L 1988, c 186, pt of §1]

Cross References

Nonprofit corporations, see chapter 415B.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next